Maryland, session 2025, SB0989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–132.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “REGISTERED OWNER” MEANS AN OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY ENROLLED IN AN UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT REGISTRY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0989*

SENATE BILL 989
(3) “REGISTRY” MEANS AN UNLAWFUL OCCUPANT REGISTRY
ESTABLISHED BY THE SHERIFF OF A COUNTY.
(B) THE SHERIFF OF A COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH AN UNAUTHORIZED
OCCUPANT REGISTRY IN ORDER TO FACILITATE THE REMOVAL OF UNAUTHORIZED
OCCUPANTS FROM DWELLINGS ON RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY IN THE COUNTY.
(C) (1) AN OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT INCLUDES A
DWELLING MAY ENROLL THE PROPERTY IN A REGISTRY ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS
LOCATED.
(2) (I) ENROLLMENT OF A PROPERTY IN A REGISTRY UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL EXPIRE AFTER 6 MONTHS.
(II) A PROPERTY OWNER MAY RE–ENROLL A PROPERTY IN THE
REGISTRY ON EXPIRATION OF A 6–MONTH ENROLLMENT PERIOD.
(3) A SHERIFF MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR:
(I) THE INITIAL ENROLLMENT OF A PROPERTY IN A REGISTRY
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) ANY SUBSEQUENT RE–ENROLLMENT OF THE PROPERTY
THAT OCCURS AT LEAST 1 YEAR AFTER THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
ENROLLMENT OR RE–ENROLLMENT OF THE PROPERTY.
(D) (1) A SHERIFF SHALL POST NOTICE ON EACH PROPERTY ENROLLED
IN A REGISTRY.
(2) NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE ON THE PROPERTY;
AND
(II) PROVIDE INFORMATION ON THE REMOVAL PROCESS FOR
ANY UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANTS ON THE PROPERTY.
(E) THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY ENROLLED IN A REGISTRY, OR
THE OWNER’S AUTHORIZED AGENT, MAY REQUEST THE IMMEDIATE REMOVAL BY
THE SHERIFF OF ANY INDIVIDUAL OCCUPYING A DWELLING ON THE PROPERTY
WITHOUT AUTHORIZATION IF:

SENATE BILL 989 3
(1) THE REGISTERED OWNER HAS THE RIGHT TO OCCUPY THE
DWELLING;
(2) THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT UNLAWFULLY ENTERED THE
DWELLING AND IS RESIDING OR OTHERWISE REMAINING IN THE DWELLING;
(3) THE DWELLING WAS NOT OPEN TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC AT
THE TIME THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT ENTERED;
(4) THE REGISTERED OWNER OR THE OWNER’S AUTHORIZED AGENT
DIRECTED THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT TO LEAVE THE DWELLING;
(5) THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS NOT A CURRENT OR FORMER
TENANT OF THE DWELLING UNDER A LEASE AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED BY THE
REGISTERED OWNER;
(6) THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS NOT A CURRENT OR FORMER
LAWFULLY RECORDED OWNER WITH ANY INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY OR THE
DWELLING AND IS NOT LISTED ON THE TITLE TO THE PROPERTY;
(7) THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS NOT A MEMBER OF THE
IMMEDIATE FAMILY OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OR ANY CO–OWNER OF THE
PROPERTY OR THE DWELLING; AND
(8) THERE IS NO PENDING LITIGATION RELATED TO THE PROPERTY
OR THE DWELLING BETWEEN THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT AND THE
REGISTERED OWNER OR ANY CO–OWNER OF THE PROPERTY OR THE DWELLING.
(F) A REQUEST BY A REGISTERED OWNER TO IMMEDIATELY REMOVE AN
UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE
SHERIFF IN SUBSTANTIALLY THE FOLLOWING FORM:
“REQUEST TO IMMEDIATELY REMOVE AN UNLAWFUL OCCUPANT OF
A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY
I, THE REGISTERED OWNER OR AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY LOCATED AT ____________________ (ADDRESS),
DECLARE UNDER THE PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT (INITIAL EACH ITEM):
__ I AM THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE PROPERTY, OR THE AUTHORIZED AGENT
OF THE REGISTERED OWNER.

SENATE BILL 989
__ THE REGISTERED OWNER PURCHASED THE PROPERTY ON ________________
(DATE).
__ THE PROPERTY INCLUDES A RESIDENTIAL DWELLING.
__ THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT UNLAWFULLY ENTERED THE DWELLING AND IS
RESIDING OR OTHERWISE REMAINS IN THE DWELLING.
__ THE DWELLING WAS NOT OPEN TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC AT THE TIME THE
UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT ENTERED.
__ I HAVE DIRECTED THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT, EITHER PERSONALLY OR
THROUGH AN AUTHORIZED AGENT, TO LEAVE THE DWELLING AND THE
UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT HAS NOT DONE SO.
__ THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS NOT A CURRENT OR FORMER TENANT OF THE
DWELLING UNDER A LEASE AGREEMENT, AND ANY LEASE THAT MAY BE PRODUCED
BY THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS FRAUDULENT.
__ THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS NOT AN OWNER OR CO–OWNER OF THE
PROPERTY OR THE DWELLING AND HAS NOT BEEN LISTED ON THE TITLE TO THE
PROPERTY, AND ANY TITLE OR OTHER ALLEGEDLY OFFICIAL COPY OF A PROPERLY
RECORDED INSTRUMENT IS THE RESULT OF TITLE FRAUD OR OTHER FRAUDULENT
ACTIVITY.
__ THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT IS NOT A MEMBER OF THE IMMEDIATE FAMILY
OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OR ANY CO–OWNER OF THE PROPERTY OR THE
DWELLING.
__ THERE IS NO PENDING LITIGATION RELATED TO THE PROPERTY OR THE
DWELLING BETWEEN THE UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANT AND THE REGISTERED
OWNER OR ANY CO–OWNER OF THE PROPERTY OR THE DWELLING.”.
(G) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST TO REMOVE AN UNAUTHORIZED
OCCUPANT, A SHERIFF SHALL VERIFY THAT THE PERSON MAKING THE REQUEST IS
REGISTERED AS THE RECORD OWNER OF THE PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF
THE COMPLAINT, OR THE AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE RECORD OWNER AND
APPEARS TO BE ENTITLED TO RELIEF UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF VERIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SHERIFF SHALL, WITHOUT DELAY, SERVE NOTICE TO VACATE THE PROPERTY
WITHIN 1 WEEK AFTER RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE ON EACH UNAUTHORIZED

SENATE BILL 989 5
OCCUPANT AND SHALL PUT THE REGISTERED OWNER IN POSSESSION OF THE
PROPERTY AT THAT TIME.
(3) NOTICE POSTED ON THE PROPERTY UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2)
OF THIS SECTION CREATES A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT THE OCCUPANT,
UNLESS SPECIFICALLY AUTHORIZED BY THE PROPERTY OWNER OR THE OWNER’S
AUTHORIZED AGENT, ENTERED THE DWELLING UNLAWFULLY AND IS NOT
AUTHORIZED TO BE ON THE PROPERTY.
(H) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL REMOVED FROM A DWELLING UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A REGISTERED OWNER IF THE REMOVAL
WAS MADE IN BAD FAITH.
(2) A COURT MAY AWARD A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF IN A CASE
BROUGHT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) COURT COSTS;
(II) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES;
(III) RETURN OF POSSESSION OF THE DWELLING, IF
APPROPRIATE; AND
(IV) ACTUAL DAMAGES FOR THE LOSS OF OR DAMAGE TO
FURNITURE, IMPLEMENTS, TOOLS, GOODS, EFFECTS, OR OTHER PERSONAL
PROPERTY INCURRED DURING THE IMPROPER REMOVAL OF THE PLAINTIFF FROM
THE PROPERTY, IF ANY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.